apertium-ncx.ncx.lexc
LEXICON TV-Raiz

namaka%<tv%>:namaka	       TAM-Clase1 ; ! "vender s.t."
tlaksa%<tv%>:tlaksa        TAM-Clase1 ; ! "step on (pisar)"
tlasojtla%<tv%>:tlasojtla  TAM-Clase1 ; ! "amar"
ajua%<tv%>:ajua            TAM-Clase1 ; ! "scold"
uika%<tv%>:uika            TAM-Clase1 ; ! "llevar"
ualika%<tv%>:ualika        TAM-Clase1 ; ! "traer"

panoa%<tv%>:pano           TAM-Panoa ; ! "pasar (a alguien/algo)"
ita%<tv%>:it		       TAM-Ita ; !"ver"

chiua%<tv%>:chi%{u%}       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "hacer"
ilkaua%<tv%>:ilkau         TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "forget"
chiya%<tv%>:chi%{y%}       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "wait for"
eua%<tv%>:eu               TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "raise, lift, get up (e.g. from bed)"
kaua%<tv%>:ka%{u%}         TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "dejar"
koua%<tv%>:kou             TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "comprar"
kuepa%<tv%>:kuep           TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "voltear"
chipaua%<tv%>:chipau	   TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "limpiar"
xipeua%<tv%>:xipeu	       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "pelar"
paka%<tv%>:pak		       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "lavar"
piya%<tv%>:pi%{y%}	       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "tener"
notsa%<tv%>:nots           TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "call"

kaki%<tv%>:kak             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "escuchar"
nauateki%<tv%>:nauatek     TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "embrace"
ilnamiki%<tv%>:ilnamik     TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "remember"
mati%<tv%>:mat             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "saber"
ixmati%<tv%>:ixmat         TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "conocer"
teki%<tv%>:tek             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "cortar"
tejteki%<tv%>:tejtek       TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "cortar varias veces"
neki%<tv%>:nek             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "querer"

paleuia%<tv%>:paleui	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "ayudar"
kualania%<tv%>:kualani     TAM-Clase3 ; ! "anger"
majtia%<tv%>:majti         TAM-Clase3 ; ! "frighten"
miktia%<tv%>:mikti         TAM-Clase3 ; ! "kill"
pakiltia%<tv%>:pakilti     TAM-Clase3 ; ! "make happy, cheer up"
kixtia%<tv%>:kixti         TAM-Clase3 ; ! "take out, remove"
paktia%<tv%>:pakti	       TAM-Clase3 ; ! "hacer feliz / gustar"
tlakualtia%<tv%>:tlakualti TAM-Clase3 ; ! "feed"
ijtoa%<tv%>:ijto           TAM-Clase3 ; ! decir"
tlalia%<tv%>:tlali	       TAM-Clase3 ; ! "poner 
machtia%<tv%>:machti	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "enseñar/hacer saber"
ijtotia%<tv%>:ijtoti       TAM-Clase3 ; ! "dance"
nankilia%<n%>:nankili      TAM-Clase3 ; ! "contestar"

kua%<tv%>:kua		       TAM-Clase4 ; ! "consumir/comer"

LEXICON DV-Raiz
maka%<tv2%>:maka       	   TAM-Clase1 ; ! "dar"

ilia%<tv2%>:ili	           TAM-Clase3 ; ! "decir"
